Hawaii statutes.
[§356D-120] Additional powers. The
powers conferred upon the authority by this part shall be in addition and
supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law, and nothing in this part
shall be construed as limiting any powers, rights, privileges, or immunities of
the authority. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next